Nevada, session 83, SB421.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 293.269905 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269905 1. Each county clerk shall schedule a meeting
with each Indian tribe located in whole or in part within the county
for, to the extent practicable:
(a) Not later than August 1 of each odd-numbered year to
discuss the details for the next regularly scheduled election cycle.
Such a meeting may address, without limitation:
(1) The establishment and operation of polling places,
temporary branch polling places or ballot drop boxes within an
Indian reservation or Indian colony and the size requirements for
any such polling places and temporary branch polling places;
(2) The dates and times of the upcoming elections for which
polling places, temporary branch polling places or ballot drop boxes
may be established;
(3) The deadlines relating to the next regularly scheduled
election cycle for the Indian tribe to submit a request pursuant to
NRS 293.2733 and 293.3572 for the establishment of polling places,
temporary branch polling places or ballot drop boxes;
(4) Responsibilities for the recruitment of election board
officers; and
(5) Any other information relating to the establishment and
operation of polling places, temporary branch polling places and
ballot drop boxes;
(b) Not later than September 1 of each odd-numbered year to
confirm any details relating to the establishment and operation of a
polling place, temporary branch polling places or ballot drop boxes.
Such a meeting may address, without limitation:
(1) Whether the Indian tribe will request or has requested to
establish any polling places, temporary branch polling places or
ballot drop boxes within an Indian reservation or Indian colony and
the size requirements for any such polling places and temporary
branch polling places;
(2) The days and hours of any polling place or temporary
branch polling place established within an Indian reservation or
Indian colony;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(3) Election board officers for any polling place or temporary
branch polling place established within an Indian reservation or
Indian colony; and
(4) The deadlines relating to the next regularly scheduled
election cycle for the Indian tribe to submit a request pursuant to
NRS 293.2733 and 293.3572; and
(c) On an ongoing basis during the year of an election if an
Indian tribe elects to establish any polling places or temporary
branch polling places within an Indian reservation or Indian colony.
2. If a county clerk:
(a) Is unable to make contact with an Indian tribe to carry out
the requirements of subsection 1, the county clerk shall contact the
Secretary of State to facilitate contact; or
(b) Has not contacted an Indian tribe, a representative of the
Indian tribe may contact the Secretary of State to facilitate contact.
3. Regardless of whether the meeting scheduled pursuant to
this section addresses responsibilities for the recruitment of
election board officers, a county clerk shall recruit election board
officers for any polling place established within the boundaries of
an Indian reservation or Indian colony unless an Indian tribe
affirmatively declines to have the county clerk recruit election
board officers.
4. The tribal liaison designated by the Office of the Secretary
of State pursuant to NRS 233A.260 may assist the county clerk or
an Indian tribe to facilitate any contact required pursuant to this
section.
Sec. 2. NRS 293B.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293B.260 1. Within a reasonable time before each election,
the county or city clerk shall instruct the members of the election
board in the use of the mechanical voting system and in their duties
in connection therewith.
2. The county or city clerk shall ensure that the instruction
provided to members of the election board in his or her county is
provided to an election board officer that is appointed to staff a
polling place which will be established within the boundaries of an
Indian reservation or Indian colony pursuant to NRS 293.2733,
293.3572, 293C.2675 or 293C.3572 by providing at least one
training class:
(a) Within the boundaries of the Indian reservation or Indian
colony, unless the Indian tribe elects to not have the training class
conducted in such a manner; and
(b) In a manner that is accessible to a member of the election
board in person or remotely.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Sec. 3. NRS 293C.2625 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.2625 1. Each city clerk shall schedule a meeting with
each Indian tribe located in whole or in part within the city for, to
the extent practicable:
(a) Not later than August 1 of each odd-numbered year to
discuss the details for the next regularly scheduled election cycle.
Such a meeting may address, without limitation:
(1) The establishment and operation of polling places,
temporary branch polling places or ballot drop boxes within an
Indian reservation or Indian colony and the size requirements for
any such polling places and temporary branch polling places;
(2) The dates and times of the upcoming elections for which
polling places, temporary branch polling places or ballot drop boxes
may be established;
(3) The deadlines relating to the next regularly scheduled
election cycle for the Indian tribe to submit a request pursuant to
NRS 293C.2675 and 293C.3572 for the establishment of polling
places, temporary branch polling places or ballot drop boxes;
(4) Responsibilities for the recruitment of election board
officers; and
(5) Any other information relating to the establishment and
operation of polling places, temporary branch polling places and
ballot drop boxes;
(b) Not later than September 1 of each odd-numbered year to
confirm any details relating to the establishment and operation of
polling places, temporary branch polling places or ballot drop boxes.
Such a meeting may address, without limitation:
(1) Whether the Indian tribe will request or has requested to
establish any polling places, temporary branch polling places or
ballot drop boxes within an Indian reservation or Indian colony and
the size requirements for any such polling places and temporary
branch polling places;
(2) The days and hours of any polling place or temporary
branch polling place established within an Indian reservation or
Indian colony;
(3) Election board officers for any polling place or temporary
branch polling place established within an Indian reservation or
Indian colony; and
(4) The deadlines relating to the next regularly scheduled
election cycle for the Indian tribe to submit a request pursuant to
NRS 293C.2675 and 293C.3572; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(c) On an ongoing basis during the year of an election if an
Indian tribe elects to establish any polling places or temporary
branch polling places within an Indian reservation or Indian colony.
2. If a city clerk:
(a) Is unable to make contact with an Indian tribe to carry out
the requirements of subsection 1, the city clerk shall contact the
Secretary of State to facilitate contact; or
(b) Has not contacted an Indian tribe, a representative of the
Indian tribe may contact the Secretary of State to facilitate contact.
3. Regardless of whether the meeting scheduled pursuant to
this section addresses responsibilities for the recruitment of
election board officers, a city clerk shall recruit election board
officers for any polling place established within the boundaries of
an Indian reservation or Indian colony unless an Indian tribe
affirmatively declines to have the city clerk recruit election board
officers.
4. The tribal liaison designated by the Office of the Secretary
of State pursuant to NRS 233A.260 may assist a city clerk or an
Indian tribe to facilitate any contact required pursuant to this
section.
Sec. 4. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)